Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3513
Homestead; exemption; notice; contents.

The county assessor shall mail a notice on or before April 1 to claimants who are the owners of a homestead which was granted an exemption under section 77-3506, 77-3507, or 77-3508 and who are required to refile for such exemption in the current year unless the claimant has already filed the application for the current year or the county assessor has reason to believe there has been a change of circumstances so that the claimant no longer qualifies. The notice shall include the claimant's name, the application deadlines for the current year, a list of documents that must be filed with the application, and the county assessor's office address and telephone number.

Laws 1979, LB 65, § 13;

Laws 1980, LB 647, § 8;

Laws 1983, LB 195, § 6;

Laws 1983, LB 396, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 809, § 9;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 6, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 1258, § 6;

Laws 1987, LB 376A, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 773, § 22;

Laws 1994, LB 902, § 38;

Laws 1995, LB 133, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1039, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 397, § 28;

Laws 1999, LB 179, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 54, § 19;

Laws 2007, LB145, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB94, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB986, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB1087, § 13;

Laws 2018, LB1089, § 16;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 86.